Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 40.16 RCW to read as follows:(1) No person shall cause to be communicated to the filing office as defined in RCW 62A.9A-102 for filing a record if:(a) The person is not authorized to file the record under RCW 62A.9A-509, 62A.9A-708, or 62A.9A-808;(b) The record is not related to an existing or anticipated transaction that is or will be governed by Article 62A.9A RCW; and(c) The record is filed with the intent to harass or defraud the person identified as debtor in the record.(2) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.Sec. 2. RCW 62A.9A-510 and 2011 c 74 s 720 are each amended to read as follows:(a) Filed record effective if authorized. A filed record is effective only to the extent that it was filed by a person that may file it under RCW 62A.9A-509 or by the filing office under section 3 of this act.(b) Authorization by one secured party of record. A record authorized by one secured party of record does not affect the financing statement with respect to another secured party of record.(c) Continuation statement not timely filed. A continuation statement that is not filed within the six-month period prescribed by RCW 62A.9A-515(d) is ineffective.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to Article 62A.9A RCW to read as follows:TERMINATION OF WRONGFULLY FILED FINANCING STATEMENT; REINSTATEMENT. (a) Trusted filer. "Trusted filer" means a person that regularly causes records to be communicated to the filing office through batch filing and has provided the office with current contact information and information sufficient to establish its identity.(b) Affidavit of wrongful filing. A person identified as debtor in a filed financing statement may deliver to the filing office a notarized affidavit, signed under penalty of perjury, that identifies the financing statement by file number, indicates the affiant's mailing address, and states that the affiant believes that the filed record identifying the affiant as debtor was not authorized to be filed and was caused to be communicated to the office with the intent to harass or defraud the affiant. The office may reject an affidavit that is incomplete or that it believes was delivered to it with the intent to harass or defraud the secured party. The department of licensing filing office shall adopt a form of affidavit for use under this section.(c) Termination statement by filing office. Subject to subsection (k) of this section, if an affidavit is delivered to the filing office under subsection (b) of this section, the office shall promptly file a termination statement with respect to the financing statement identified in the affidavit. The termination statement must identify by its file number the initial financing statement to which it relates and must indicate that it was filed pursuant to this section. A termination statement filed under this subsection is not effective until 30 days after it is filed.(d) No fee charged or refunded. The filing office shall not charge a fee for the filing of an affidavit under subsection (b) of this section or a termination statement under subsection (c) of this section. The office shall not return any fee paid for filing the financing statement identified in the affidavit, whether or not the financing statement is reinstated under subsection (g) of this section.(e) Notice of termination statement. On the same day that a filing office files a termination statement under subsection (c) of this section, it shall send to the secured party of record for the financing statement to which the termination statement relates a notice stating that the termination statement has been filed and will become effective 30 days after filing. The notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address provided for the secured party of record in the financing statement with a copy sent by electronic mail to the electronic mail address provided by the secured party of record, if any.(f) Administrative review; action for reinstatement. A secured party that believes in good faith that the filed record identified in an affidavit delivered to the filing office under subsection (b) of this section was authorized to be filed and was not caused to be communicated to the office with the intent to harass or defraud the affiant may:(1) Before the termination statement takes effect, request that the office conduct an expedited review of the filed record and any documentation provided by the secured party. The office may as a result of this review remove from the record the termination statement filed by it under subsection (c) of this section before it takes effect and conduct an administrative review under subsection (k) of this section;(2) At any time file an action against the office seeking reinstatement of the financing statement to which the filed record relates. The action must be filed before the expiration of six months after the date on which the termination statement filed under subsection (c) of this section becomes effective. If the affiant is not named as a defendant in the action, the secured party shall send a copy of the complaint to the affiant at the address indicated in the affidavit. The exclusive venue for the action shall be in the superior court for the county where the filing office in which the financing statement was filed is located. The action shall be considered by the court on an expedited basis.(g) Office to file notice of action for reinstatement. Within 10 days after being served with process in an action under subsection (f) of this section, the filing office shall file a notice indicating that the action has been commenced. The notice must indicate the file number of the initial financing statement to which it relates.(h) Action for reinstatement successful. If, in an action under subsection (f) of this section, the court determines that the financing statement was authorized to be filed and was not caused to be communicated to the office with the intent to harass or defraud the affiant, it shall order that the financing statement be reinstated. If an order of reinstatement is issued by the court, the office shall promptly file a record that identifies by its file number the initial financing statement to which the record relates and indicates that the financing statement has been reinstated.(i) Effect of reinstatement. Upon the filing of a record reinstating a financing statement under subsection (h) of this section the effectiveness of the financing statement is reinstated and the financing statement shall be considered never to have been terminated under this section. A continuation statement filed as provided in RCW 62A.9A-515(d) after the effective date of a termination statement filed under subsection (c) or (k) of this section becomes effective if the financing statement is reinstated.(j) Liability for wrongful filing. If, in an action under subsection (f) of this section, the court determines that the filed record identified in an affidavit delivered to the filing office under subsection (b) of this section was caused to be communicated to the filing office with the intent to harass or defraud the affiant, the office and the affiant may recover from the secured party that filed the action the costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, that the office and the affiant incurred in the action. This recovery is in addition to any recovery to which the affiant is entitled under RCW 62A.9A-625.(k) Procedure for record filed by trusted filer. If an affidavit delivered to a filing office under subsection (b) of this section relates to a filed record communicated to the office by a trusted filer, the office shall promptly send to the secured party of record a notice stating that the affidavit has been delivered to it and that it is conducting an administrative review to determine whether the record was caused to be communicated with the intent to harass or defraud the affiant. The notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address provided for the secured party in the financing statement with a copy sent by electronic mail to the electronic mail address provided by the secured party of record, if any, and a copy shall be sent in the same manner to the affiant. The administrative review shall be conducted on an expedited basis and the office may require the affiant and the secured party of record to provide any additional information that the office deems appropriate. If the office concludes that the record was caused to be communicated with the intent to harass or defraud the affiant, it shall promptly file a termination statement under subsection (b) of this section that will be effective immediately and send to the secured party of record the notice required by subsection (e) of this section. The secured party may thereafter file an action for reinstatement under subsection (f) of this section and the provisions of subsections (g) through (j) of this section are applicable.Sec. 4. RCW 62A.9A-516 and 2011 c 74 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:(a) What constitutes filing. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, communication of a record to a filing office and tender of the filing fee or acceptance of the record by the filing office constitutes filing.(b) Refusal to accept record; filing does not occur. Filing does not occur with respect to a record that a filing office refuses to accept because:(1) The record is not communicated by a method or medium of communication authorized by the filing office;(2) An amount equal to or greater than the applicable filing fee is not tendered or, in the case of a filing office described in RCW 62A.9A-501(a)(1), an amount equal to the applicable filing fee is not tendered;(3) The filing office is unable to index the record because:(A) In the case of an initial financing statement, the record does not provide a name for the debtor;(B) In the case of an amendment or information statement, the record:(i) Does not identify the initial financing statement as required by RCW 62A.9A-512 or 62A.9A-518, as applicable; or(ii) Identifies an initial financing statement whose effectiveness has lapsed under RCW 62A.9A-515;(C) In the case of an initial financing statement that provides the name of a debtor identified as an individual or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor identified as an individual which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the record relates, the record does not identify the debtor's surname; or(D) In the case of a record filed or recorded in the filing office described in RCW 62A.9A-501(a)(1), the record does not provide a name for the debtor or a sufficient description of the real property to which the record relates;(4) In the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that adds a secured party of record, the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the secured party of record;(5) In the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the amendment relates, the record does not:(A) Provide a mailing address for the debtor; or(B) Indicate whether the name provided as the name of the debtor is the name of an individual or an organization;(6) In the case of an assignment reflected in an initial financing statement under RCW 62A.9A-514(a) or an amendment filed under RCW 62A.9A-514(b), the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the assignee; ((or))(7) In the case of a continuation statement, the record is not filed within the six-month period prescribed by RCW 62A.9A-515(d); or(8) In the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor that was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the amendment relates, the record was not communicated to the office by a trusted filer and the office reasonably believes that the record was caused to be communicated to it with the intent to harass or defraud the person identified as debtor. The office has no duty to form a belief as to whether a record was caused to be communicated with the intent to harass or defraud the person identified as debtor and has no duty to investigate or ascertain facts relevant to whether such intent was present.(c) Rules applicable to subsection (b) of this section. For purposes of subsection (b) of this section:(1) A record does not provide information if the filing office is unable to read or decipher the information; and(2) A record that does not indicate that it is an amendment or identify an initial financing statement to which it relates, as required by RCW 62A.9A-512, 62A.9A-514, or 62A.9A-518, is an initial financing statement.(d) Refusal to accept record; record effective as filed record. A record that is communicated to the filing office with tender of the filing fee, but which the filing office refuses to accept for a reason other than one set forth in subsection (b) of this section, is effective as a filed record except as against a purchaser of the collateral which gives value in reasonable reliance upon the absence of the record from the files.(e) A record that the filing office initially refuses to accept under subsection (b)(8) of this section but that it later accepts after it receives additional information is effective as if the office had not initially refused to accept it except as against a purchaser of the collateral that gives value in reasonable reliance upon the absence of the record from the files.--- END ---